Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 9. Corner Perpetuation and Filing Act

§ 33-29-901.
Short title.

W.S.

33-29-901

through

33-29-910

may be cited as the “Corner Perpetuation and Filing Act”.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 219, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 36-215; W.S. 1977, §

36-11-101

; 1997, ch. 116, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

33-29-140

; renumbered from §

33-29-140

by 2013 ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “33-29-201 through

33-29-910

” for “33-29-140 through 33-29-149”.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013, amended and renumbered former §

33-29-140

as §

33-29-901

.

§ 33-29-902.
Definitions.

Except where the context indicates a different meaning, terms used in W.S.

33-29-901

through

33-29-910

shall be defined as follows:

A “property corner” is a geographic point on the surface of the earth, and is on, a part of, and controls a property line;

A “property controlling corner” for a property is a public land survey corner or any property corner which does not lie on a property line of the property in question, but which controls the location of one (1) or more of the property corners of the property in question;

A “public land survey corner” is any corner actually established and monumented in an original survey or resurvey used as a basis of legal description for issuing a patent for the land to a private person from the United States government;

A “corner,” unless otherwise qualified, means a property corner, or a property controlling corner, or a public land survey corner or any combination of these;

An “accessory to a corner” is any exclusively identifiable physical object whose spatial relationship to the corner is recorded. Accessories may be bearing trees, bearing objects, monuments, reference monuments, line trees, pits, mounds, charcoal-filled bottles, steel or wooden stakes, or other objects;

A “monument” is an accessory that is presumed to occupy the exact position of a corner;

A “reference monument” is a special monument that does not occupy the same geographical position as the corner itself, but whose spatial relationship to the corner is recorded and which serves to witness the corner;

A “professional land surveyor” is a surveyor who is licensed to practice professional land surveying under W.S.

33-29-201

through

33-29-801

, and has a current license for that calendar year;

The “board” is the Wyoming board of professional engineers and professional land surveyors.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 219, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 36-216; W.S. 1977, §

36-11-102

; 1997, ch. 116, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 33-29-141; renumbered from § 33-29-141 by 2013 ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, in (a) substituted “33-29-201 through

33-29-910

” for “33-29-140 through 33-29-149”; in (a)(viii), substituted “professional” for “registered” before “land surveyor”, substituted “licensed” for “registered” after “surveyor who is”, added “professional” after “practice”, substituted “33-29-201 through

33-29-801

” for “33-29-114 through 33-29-139,” substituted “license” for “certificate” after “current”; in (a)(ix), substituted “Wyoming board of” for “state board of registration for”, and made stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013, amended and renumbered former § 33-29-141 as §

33-29-902

.

§ 33-29-903.
Completion of “corner file”.

A professional land surveyor shall complete, sign, and file with the county clerk where the corner is situated, a written record of corner establishment or restoration to be known as a “corner file” for every public land survey corner and accessory to such corner which is established, reestablished, monumented, remonumented, restored, rehabilitated, perpetuated or used as control in any survey by such surveyor, and within ninety (90) days thereafter, unless the corner and its accessories are substantially as described in an existing corner record filed in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

33-29-901

through

33-29-910

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 219, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 36-217; W.S. 1977, §

36-11-103

; 1997, ch. 116, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 33-29-142; renumbered from § 33-29-142 by 2013 ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “professional land” near the beginning, and substituted “33-29-901 through

33-29-910

” for “33-29-140 through 33-29-149”.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013, amended and renumbered former § 33-29-142 as §

33-29-903

.

§ 33-29-904.
Filing of corner reference.

A professional land surveyor may file such corner record as to any property corner, property controlling corner, reference monument or accessory to a corner.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 219, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 36-218; W.S. 1977, §

36-11-104

; 1997, ch. 116, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 33-29-143; 2013 ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added “professional land”.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013, amended and renumbered former § 33-29-143 as §

33-29-904

.

§ 33-29-905.
Information to be included in corner file; form.

The board shall by regulation provide and prescribe the information which shall be necessary to be included in the corner file and the board shall prescribe the form in which the corner record shall be presented and filed.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 219, § 5; W.S. 1957. § 36-219; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; W.S. 1977, §

36-11-105

; 1997, ch. 116, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 33-29-144; renumbered from § 33-29-144 by 2013 ch. 11, § 4, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 4, effective July 1, 2013, renumbered former § 33-29-144 as §

33-29-905

.

§ 33-29-906.
Preservation of map records; public inspection.

The county clerk of the county containing the corners, as part of his files, shall have on record maps of each township within the county, the bearings and lengths of the connecting lines to government corners and government corners looked for and not found. These records shall be preserved in accordance with W.S. 18-3-402(a)(vi).

The county clerk shall make these records available for public inspection during all usual office hours.

The filing fee for each corner record or certificate shall be as provided in W.S. 18-3-402(a)(xvi)(Q) and each record or certificate shall apply to only one (1) corner.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 219, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 36-220; Laws 1987, ch. 23, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

36-11-106

; 1997, ch. 116, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 33-29-145; Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 4; 2018 ch. 27, § 1, effective March 9, 2018; 2019 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

The 2018 amendment,

in (c), substituted “record or certificate shall be as provided” for “record or certificate is one dollar ($1.00) as provided.”

Laws 2018, ch. 27, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2018.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the last sentence of (a), substituted “accordance with W.S. 18-3-402(a)(vi)” for “hardbound books in numerical order as filed.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 4, effective July 1, 2013, renumbered former § 33-29-145 as §

33-29-906

.

§ 33-29-907.
Reconstruction or rehabilitation of monument.

In every case where a corner record of a public land survey corner is required to be filed under the provisions of W.S.

33-29-901

through

33-29-910

, the professional land surveyor must reconstruct or rehabilitate the monument of such corner, and accessories to such corner, so that the same shall be left by him in such physical condition that it remains as permanent a monument as is reasonably possible and so that the same may be reasonably expected to be located with facility at all times in the future.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 219, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 36-221; W.S. 1977, §

36-11-107

; 1997, ch. 116, § 2; W.S. 1977, § 33-29-146; renumbered from § 33-29-146 by 2013 ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “33-29-901 through

33-29-910

” for “33-29-140 through 33-29-149”, and added “professional land”.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013, amended and renumbered former § 33-29-146 as §

33-29-907

.

§ 33-29-908.
Signature on corner record required.

No corner record shall be filed unless the same is signed by a professional land surveyor, or, in the case of an agency of the United States government or the state of Wyoming, the certificate may be signed by the survey party chief making the survey.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 219, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 36-222; W.S. 1977, §

36-11-108

; 1997, ch. 116, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 33-29-147; renumbered from § 33-29-147 by 2013 ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “professional” for “registered”.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013, amended and renumbered former § 33-29-147 as §

33-29-908

.

§ 33-29-909.
Previously existing corners.

Corner records may be filed concerning corners established, reestablished or restored before the effective date of W.S.

33-29-901

through

33-29-910

.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 219, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 36-223; W.S. 1977, §

36-11-109

; 1997, ch. 116, § 2; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 33-29-148; renumbered from § 33-29-148 by 2013 ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “33-29-901 through

33-29-910

” for “33-29-140 through 33-29-149”.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 3, effective July 1, 2013, amended and renumbered former § 33-29-148 as §

33-29-909

.

§ 33-29-910.
Exemption from filing fees.

All filings relative to official cadastral surveys of the bureau of land management of the United States of America performed by authorized personnel shall be exempt from filing fees.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 219, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 36-224; W.S. 1977, §

36-11-110

; 1997, ch. 116, § 3; W.S. 1977, § 33-29-149; renumbered from § 33-29-149 by 2013 ch. 11, § 4, effective July 1, 2013.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 11, § 4, effective July 1, 2013, renumbered former § 33-29-149 as §

33-29-910

.